Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2040
Termination of system or contributions; effect.

Upon termination or partial termination of the retirement system or upon complete discontinuance of contributions under the retirement system, the rights of all affected members to benefits accrued to the date of such termination, partial termination, or discontinuance, to the extent funded as of such date, shall be nonforfeitable.

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 68.